Hawaii statutes.
§166-5 Joint ventures. Any
agricultural park developed by the department in partnership with a federal
agency, a county, or a private party shall be subject to a partnership
agreement approved by the board of agriculture, which agreement shall provide, at
a minimum:

(1) A determination by the board that it is in the
public interest to enter into the partnership agreement;

(2) Long-term assurance that the land will be
utilized for agricultural or aquacultural purposes;

(3) Board approval of the agricultural park
development plans and specifications;

(4) Selection and management of lessees in a manner
approved by the board; and

(5) Conditions to ensure a public benefit from any
state funds expended for the project. [L 1986, c 222, pt of §1; am L 1988, c
22, §1; am L 1990, c 52, §2; am L 1993, c 102, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next